Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 7. Designation of Areas for Development and Redevelopment.

§ 43-35-301.
Declaration of legislative intent.

It is hereby declared to be the intent of the Legislature, by this article, to assist municipalities of this state in the growth, development and redevelopment of downtown areas within their corporate limits by authorizing any of said municipalities to designate areas for development and/or redevelopment and to provide a method for accomplishing said purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-251; Laws, 1972, ch. 395, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 43-35-303.
Refurbishing of physical facilities authorized.

The governing authorities of any municipality are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to construct, repair, improve, renovate or otherwise recondition physical facilities owned or leased by the municipality within the municipalities subject to the provisions hereinafter set out.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-252; Laws, 1972, ch. 395, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 43-35-305.
Designation of location of facility; hearing.

The governing authorities, prior to utilizing the authority granted under this article, shall designate the area within which said facility shall be located and shall hold a hearing as provided in Section 21-41-5, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-253; Laws, 1972, ch. 395, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 43-35-307.
Determination of cost.

In determining the overall cost of said facility, the following are to be considered by the governing authorities: the acquisition of the land, either by purchase or lease or otherwise, and all expenses incident thereto; the cost of any surfacing, building, lighting, drainage or other improvements necessary for the safe and convenient maintenance and operation of such facility; whatever annual costs of operation are necessary by way of maintenance, police or fire protection; and all other operational or administrative expenses. The costs and all expenses incurred by virtue of this article shall be charged upon the property benefitted thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-254; Laws, 1972, ch. 395, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 43-35-309.
Charges for use of facilities.

The governing authorities of such municipality are hereby authorized, in their discretion, to make such charges as would be deemed proper for the use of such facilities. Any revenue received from any of such charges may be pledged for the payment of bonds issued hereunder or otherwise credited against the cost and expense to be charged against the property benefitted thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-255; Laws, 1972, ch. 395, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 43-35-311.
Levy of taxes.

The governing authorities are hereby authorized and empowered to levy, collect and make any annual special tax or assessment against the benefitted property in the designated area. However, no assessment, not to exceed five (5) mills, made under the provisions of this article shall be made against the benefitted property until notice of the proposed action is furnished to the owners of the property on which said assessment is to be made, in the same manner as provided in Section 21-41-5, Mississippi Code of 1972. At the meeting called for the hearing of any objections that may be made by said property owners, any property owner aggrieved may appear in person, by attorney, or by petition on any objection to the proposal or any part thereof. The board shall consider the objections, if any, and may confirm, modify or rescind the resolution of necessity and shall determine whether said proposal shall be implemented and how the cost thereof shall be paid. The determination of the board shall be final and conclusive at the expiration of the protest period hereinafter provided, subject only to an appeal to a court of appropriate jurisdiction within thirty (30) days after said order becomes final. If property owners owning more than one-third (1/3) of the front footage of the property in the designated area shall file a protest, then the provisions of this article shall not be utilized. Any protest made, as provided herein, shall be in writing, signed by the property owner or his legal representative and filed with the city clerk within forty-five (45) days of the adjournment of said meeting. The special tax levy herein provided shall not affect or apply to any property in the designated area that is used as residential property and qualifies as a homestead under the provisions of the Homestead Exemption Law being Sections 27-33-3 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-256; Laws, 1972, ch. 395, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 43-35-313.
Issuance of bonds.

The governing authorities of such municipality are hereby authorized to issue bonds for the cost hereinabove referred to or to defray any expenditures made by said municipality out of its general fund which are necessary and authorized herein. Such bonds shall be sold on sealed bids at public sale in the manner provided by Section 31-19-25, Mississippi Code of 1972. Any expenditure disbursed from said general fund shall be repaid from the proceeds of the bond issue. Any bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall have an amortization period of up to ten (10) years, such period to be determined by said governing authorities. The interest on such bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall bear a rate of interest not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 21-33-315, Mississippi Code of 1972. The principal of and the interest on such bonds shall be payable from the special taxes or assessments levied against the benefitted property in the designated area, as provided in Section 43-35-311, and may be further secured by a pledge of and payable from any revenue received from any charges for the use of facilities constructed with the proceeds of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-257; Laws, 1972, ch. 395, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 43-35-315.
Article is full and complete authority for expenditures and bonds.

This article shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the expenditure of money and the issuance of bonds as are hereby authorized and shall be construed as an additional and alternate method therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-258; Laws, 1972, ch. 395, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).